language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 331 Y 25
SFX 331 0 ach .
SFX 331 0 achmej .
SFX 331 0 achmy .
SFX 331 0 achu .
SFX 331 0 am .
SFX 331 0 ami .
SFX 331 0 ašo .
SFX 331 0 aštej .
SFX 331 0 ašćo .
SFX 331 0 e .
SFX 331 0 i .
SFX 331 0 im .
SFX 331 0 imej .
SFX 331 0 imy .
SFX 331 0 itej .
SFX 331 0 iśo .
SFX 331 0 iš .
SFX 331 0 mej .
SFX 331 0 my .
SFX 331 0 oma .
SFX 331 0 ow .
SFX 331 0 owu .
SFX 331 0 tej .
SFX 331 0 u .
SFX 331 0 śo .
SFX 332 Y 11
SFX 332 0 a .
SFX 332 0 ach .
SFX 332 0 am .
SFX 332 0 ami .
SFX 332 0 i .
SFX 332 0 imej .
SFX 332 0 imy .
SFX 332 0 itej .
SFX 332 0 iśo .
SFX 332 0 ow .
SFX 332 0 u .
SFX 333 Y 11
SFX 333 0 a .
SFX 333 0 ach .
SFX 333 0 am .
SFX 333 0 ami .
SFX 333 0 i .
SFX 333 0 imej .
SFX 333 0 imy .
SFX 333 0 itej .
SFX 333 0 iśo .
SFX 333 0 ow .
SFX 333 0 u .
SFX 334 Y 25
SFX 334 0 ach .
SFX 334 0 achmej .
SFX 334 0 achmy .
SFX 334 0 achu .
SFX 334 0 am .
SFX 334 0 ami .
SFX 334 0 ašo .
SFX 334 0 aštej .
SFX 334 0 ašćo .
SFX 334 0 e .
SFX 334 0 i .
SFX 334 0 im .
SFX 334 0 imej .
SFX 334 0 imy .
SFX 334 0 itej .
SFX 334 0 iśo .
SFX 334 0 iš .
SFX 334 0 mej .
SFX 334 0 my .
SFX 334 0 oma .
SFX 334 0 ow .
SFX 334 0 owu .
SFX 334 0 tej .
SFX 334 0 u .
SFX 334 0 ćo .
SFX 335 Y 22
SFX 335 0 ach .
SFX 335 0 achmej .
SFX 335 0 achmy .
SFX 335 0 achu .
SFX 335 0 ašo .
SFX 335 0 aštej .
SFX 335 0 ašćo .
SFX 335 0 e .
SFX 335 0 ech .
SFX 335 0 echmej .
SFX 335 0 echmy .
SFX 335 0 echu .
SFX 335 0 ešo .
SFX 335 0 eštej .
SFX 335 0 ešćo .
SFX 335 0 o .
SFX 335 0 om .
SFX 335 0 omej .
SFX 335 0 omy .
SFX 335 0 otej .
SFX 335 0 ośo .
SFX 335 0 oš .
SFX 336 Y 12
SFX 336 0 ach .
SFX 336 0 am .
SFX 336 0 ami .
SFX 336 0 i .
SFX 336 0 im .
SFX 336 0 imej .
SFX 336 0 imy .
SFX 336 0 itej .
SFX 336 0 iśo .
SFX 336 0 iš .
SFX 336 0 ow .
SFX 336 0 y .
SFX 337 Y 10
SFX 337 0 aj .
SFX 337 0 aju .
SFX 337 0 am .
SFX 337 0 ama .
SFX 337 0 ami .
SFX 337 0 as .
SFX 337 0 ich .
SFX 337 0 im .
SFX 337 0 ima .
SFX 337 0 imi .
SFX 338 Y 12
SFX 338 0 a .
SFX 338 0 ach .
SFX 338 0 am .
SFX 338 0 ami .
SFX 338 0 ej .
SFX 338 0 eje .
SFX 338 0 eju .
SFX 338 0 oma .
SFX 338 0 ow .
SFX 338 0 owu .
SFX 338 0 u .
SFX 338 0 y .
SFX 339 Y 12
SFX 339 0 a .
SFX 339 0 ach .
SFX 339 0 am .
SFX 339 0 ami .
SFX 339 0 ej .
SFX 339 0 eje .
SFX 339 0 eju .
SFX 339 0 oma .
SFX 339 0 ow .
SFX 339 0 owu .
SFX 339 0 u .
SFX 339 0 y .
SFX 340 Y 11
SFX 340 0 e .
SFX 340 0 eg .
SFX 340 0 ego .
SFX 340 0 ej .
SFX 340 0 eju .
SFX 340 0 em .
SFX 340 0 emu .
SFX 340 0 ich .
SFX 340 0 im .
SFX 340 0 ima .
SFX 340 0 imi .
SFX 341 Y 12
SFX 341 0 e .
SFX 341 0 eg .
SFX 341 0 ego .
SFX 341 0 ej .
SFX 341 0 eju .
SFX 341 0 em .
SFX 341 0 emu .
SFX 341 0 i .
SFX 341 0 ich .
SFX 341 0 im .
SFX 341 0 ima .
SFX 341 0 imi .
SFX 342 Y 13
SFX 342 0 a .
SFX 342 0 ach .
SFX 342 0 am .
SFX 342 0 ami .
SFX 342 0 e .
SFX 342 0 eju .
SFX 342 0 i .
SFX 342 0 im .
SFX 342 0 imi .
SFX 342 0 oma .
SFX 342 0 ow .
SFX 342 0 owu .
SFX 342 0 u .
SFX 343 Y 13
SFX 343 0 ach .
SFX 343 0 am .
SFX 343 0 ami .
SFX 343 0 e .
SFX 343 0 ego .
SFX 343 0 ej .
SFX 343 0 eju .
SFX 343 0 em .
SFX 343 0 emu .
SFX 343 0 ow .
SFX 343 0 y .
SFX 343 0 ym .
SFX 343 0 yma .
SFX 344 Y 12
SFX 344 0 a .
SFX 344 0 ach .
SFX 344 0 am .
SFX 344 0 ami .
SFX 344 0 e .
SFX 344 0 eju .
SFX 344 0 oju .
SFX 344 0 om .
SFX 344 0 oma .
SFX 344 0 ow .
SFX 344 0 owu .
SFX 344 0 u .
SFX 345 Y 11
SFX 345 0 a .
SFX 345 0 ach .
SFX 345 0 am .
SFX 345 0 ami .
SFX 345 0 i .
SFX 345 0 imi .
SFX 345 0 oju .
SFX 345 0 om .
SFX 345 0 oma .
SFX 345 0 owu .
SFX 345 0 u .
SFX 346 Y 12
SFX 346 0 a .
SFX 346 0 ach .
SFX 346 0 am .
SFX 346 0 ami .
SFX 346 0 e .
SFX 346 0 i .
SFX 346 0 imi .
SFX 346 0 oju .
SFX 346 0 om .
SFX 346 0 oma .
SFX 346 0 owu .
SFX 346 0 u .
SFX 347 Y 15
SFX 347 0 a .
SFX 347 0 ach .
SFX 347 0 am .
SFX 347 0 ami .
SFX 347 0 e .
SFX 347 0 eju .
SFX 347 0 i .
SFX 347 0 im .
SFX 347 0 o .
SFX 347 0 oju .
SFX 347 0 om .
SFX 347 0 oma .
SFX 347 0 ow .
SFX 347 0 owu .
SFX 347 0 u .
SFX 348 Y 12
SFX 348 0 a .
SFX 348 0 ach .
SFX 348 0 am .
SFX 348 0 ami .
SFX 348 0 e .
SFX 348 0 imi .
SFX 348 0 oju .
SFX 348 0 om .
SFX 348 0 oma .
SFX 348 0 ow .
SFX 348 0 owu .
SFX 348 0 u .
SFX 349 Y 10
SFX 349 0 i .
SFX 349 0 imej .
SFX 349 0 imy .
SFX 349 0 itej .
SFX 349 0 iśo .
SFX 349 0 mej .
SFX 349 0 my .
SFX 349 0 tej .
SFX 349 0 u .
SFX 349 0 śo .
SFX 350 Y 11
SFX 350 0 i .
SFX 350 0 imej .
SFX 350 0 imy .
SFX 350 0 itej .
SFX 350 0 iśo .
SFX 350 0 mej .
SFX 350 0 my .
SFX 350 0 tej .
SFX 350 0 u .
SFX 350 0 ě .
SFX 350 0 śo .
SFX 351 Y 28
SFX 351 0 a .
SFX 351 0 ach .
SFX 351 0 achmej .
SFX 351 0 achmy .
SFX 351 0 achu .
SFX 351 0 ašo .
SFX 351 0 aštej .
SFX 351 0 ašćo .
SFX 351 0 e .
SFX 351 0 eg .
SFX 351 0 ego .
SFX 351 0 ej .
SFX 351 0 eje .
SFX 351 0 eju .
SFX 351 0 em .
SFX 351 0 emu .
SFX 351 0 i .
SFX 351 0 ich .
SFX 351 0 im .
SFX 351 0 ima .
SFX 351 0 imi .
SFX 351 0 m .
SFX 351 0 mej .
SFX 351 0 my .
SFX 351 0 tej .
SFX 351 0 u .
SFX 351 0 śo .
SFX 351 0 š .
SFX 352 Y 12
SFX 352 0 e .
SFX 352 0 i .
SFX 352 0 im .
SFX 352 0 imej .
SFX 352 0 imy .
SFX 352 0 itej .
SFX 352 0 iśo .
SFX 352 0 iš .
SFX 352 0 mej .
SFX 352 0 my .
SFX 352 0 tej .
SFX 352 0 ćo .
SFX 353 Y 14
SFX 353 0 e .
SFX 353 0 ej .
SFX 353 0 eje .
SFX 353 0 eju .
SFX 353 0 en .
SFX 353 0 ich .
SFX 353 0 im .
SFX 353 0 ima .
SFX 353 0 o .
SFX 353 0 og .
SFX 353 0 ogo .
SFX 353 0 om .
SFX 353 0 omu .
SFX 353 0 u .
SFX 354 Y 11
SFX 354 0 i .
SFX 354 0 im .
SFX 354 0 imej .
SFX 354 0 imy .
SFX 354 0 itej .
SFX 354 0 iśo .
SFX 354 0 iš .
SFX 354 0 mej .
SFX 354 0 my .
SFX 354 0 tej .
SFX 354 0 śo .
SFX 355 Y 12
SFX 355 0 e .
SFX 355 0 i .
SFX 355 0 im .
SFX 355 0 imej .
SFX 355 0 imy .
SFX 355 0 itej .
SFX 355 0 iśo .
SFX 355 0 iš .
SFX 355 0 mej .
SFX 355 0 my .
SFX 355 0 tej .
SFX 355 0 śo .
SFX 356 Y 12
SFX 356 0 a .
SFX 356 0 ach .
SFX 356 0 am .
SFX 356 0 ami .
SFX 356 0 e .
SFX 356 0 oju .
SFX 356 0 om .
SFX 356 0 oma .
SFX 356 0 ow .
SFX 356 0 owu .
SFX 356 0 u .
SFX 356 0 ymi .
SFX 357 Y 12
SFX 357 0 a .
SFX 357 0 ach .
SFX 357 0 am .
SFX 357 0 ami .
SFX 357 0 o .
SFX 357 0 oju .
SFX 357 0 om .
SFX 357 0 oma .
SFX 357 0 ow .
SFX 357 0 owu .
SFX 357 0 u .
SFX 357 0 ymi .
SFX 358 Y 12
SFX 358 0 a .
SFX 358 0 ach .
SFX 358 0 am .
SFX 358 0 ami .
SFX 358 0 oju .
SFX 358 0 om .
SFX 358 0 oma .
SFX 358 0 ow .
SFX 358 0 owu .
SFX 358 0 u .
SFX 358 0 y .
SFX 358 0 ymi .
SFX 359 Y 13
SFX 359 0 a .
SFX 359 0 ach .
SFX 359 0 am .
SFX 359 0 ami .
SFX 359 0 e .
SFX 359 0 oju .
SFX 359 0 om .
SFX 359 0 oma .
SFX 359 0 ow .
SFX 359 0 owu .
SFX 359 0 u .
SFX 359 0 y .
SFX 359 0 ymi .
SFX 360 Y 13
SFX 360 0 a .
SFX 360 0 ach .
SFX 360 0 am .
SFX 360 0 ami .
SFX 360 0 o .
SFX 360 0 oju .
SFX 360 0 om .
SFX 360 0 oma .
SFX 360 0 ow .
SFX 360 0 owu .
SFX 360 0 u .
SFX 360 0 y .
SFX 360 0 yma .
SFX 361 Y 13
SFX 361 0 ach .
SFX 361 0 am .
SFX 361 0 ami .
SFX 361 0 ijo .
SFX 361 0 ijom .
SFX 361 0 ijomej .
SFX 361 0 ijomy .
SFX 361 0 ijotej .
SFX 361 0 ijośo .
SFX 361 0 ijoš .
SFX 361 0 iju .
SFX 361 0 ow .
SFX 361 0 y .
SFX 362 Y 14
SFX 362 0 a .
SFX 362 0 ach .
SFX 362 0 am .
SFX 362 0 ami .
SFX 362 0 e .
SFX 362 0 mej .
SFX 362 0 my .
SFX 362 0 oma .
SFX 362 0 ow .
SFX 362 0 owu .
SFX 362 0 tej .
SFX 362 0 u .
SFX 362 0 y .
SFX 362 0 ćo .
SFX 363 Y 13
SFX 363 0 a .
SFX 363 0 ach .
SFX 363 0 am .
SFX 363 0 ami .
SFX 363 0 mej .
SFX 363 0 my .
SFX 363 0 oma .
SFX 363 0 ow .
SFX 363 0 owu .
SFX 363 0 tej .
SFX 363 0 u .
SFX 363 0 y .
SFX 363 0 śo .
SFX 364 Y 14
SFX 364 0 a .
SFX 364 0 ach .
SFX 364 0 am .
SFX 364 0 ami .
SFX 364 0 i .
SFX 364 0 mej .
SFX 364 0 my .
SFX 364 0 oma .
SFX 364 0 ow .
SFX 364 0 owu .
SFX 364 0 tej .
SFX 364 0 u .
SFX 364 0 y .
SFX 364 0 śo .
