language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
Bezkojsk/1,341
Bórkojsk/1,341
Bórkowsk/1,341
Bórojsk/1,341
Błotomłyńsk/1,341
Derbnojsk/1,341
Dešańsk/1,341
Dostojewsk/1,341
Fusowsk/1,341
Goeth/1,343
Grabowsk/1,341
Gółkojsk/1,341
Gółkowsk/1,341
Hurask/1,341
Huzk/1,341
Jabłońsk/1,341
Jaworsk/1,341
Kamjen/338
Kibušańsk/1,341
Kopańsk/1,341
Kowalsk/1,341
Kowaŕsk/1,341
Kórintsk/1,341
Kóslowsk/1,341
Mukwarj/1,344
Módł/1,339
Nietzsch/1,343
Popojsk/1,341
Popowsk/1,341
Purikowsk/1,340
Półměst/357
Rědk/1,341
SA-muž/356
Samarisk/1,341
Skalsk/1,341
Wuzk/1,341
Wólk/1,341
Wótšowcańsk/1,341
Zagorsk/1,341
Zulumusk/1,341
acetatžyź/1,347
blomb/363
bomb/363
cesć/334
chrap/364
chrjašć/352
chwalob/354
cyb/363
darb/354
daw/354
derb/354
dobroś/334
dopśim/349
drap/363
drišć/352
dwój/351
dymow/354
eksmusk/1,341
euro-pjenjez/356
europjenjez/356
gerc/356
gjarś/334
gjarź/334
gownow/354
groź/334
gruź/334
grěb/363
gusć/334
gódnosć/334
gólc/359
gósć/345
hap/363
j/1,353
jacmjeńsk/1,341
jaw/354
ješć/334
jěz/362
kameramuž/356
kamjen/336
klamp/363
klap/363
knydl/1,348
kopjenj/1,344
krowaŕsk/1,341
kśew/354
kśip/354
lap/363
leś/352
lib/363
lubosć/334
lutosć/334
luź/346
lěp/354
mudrosć/334
muž/356
mócnj/1,335
měst/357
młoź/334
n/1,337
neandertalsk/1,341
njebab/354
njebarw/354
njeblab/354
njebratšow/354
njeból/355
njecarob/354
njecazow/354
njecerw/354
njecesć/334
njechrjašć/352
njechrom/354
njechrop/354
njechudob/354
njechwalob/354
njecop/354
njedarb/354
njedaw/354
njederb/354
njedobroś/334
njedopśim/349
njedrapaw/354
njedrastw/354
njedrišć/352
njedrob/354
njedup/354
njedym/354
njedymow/354
njegjarb/354
njegownow/354
njegub/354
njegódnosć/334
njegłup/354
njejadušyw/354
njejaw/354
njejuchow/354
njekip/354
njekjarm/354
njekop/354
njekopśiw/354
njekrow/354
njekurjawkow/354
njekśew/354
njekśip/354
njekśiw/354
njekšaw/354
njekšom/354
njekšupow/354
njelarb/354
njeleś/352
njelubosć/334
njeluź/346
njelěp/354
njemjerw/354
njemudrosć/334
njemukow/354
njemócnj/1,335
njemóraw/354
njenajm/349
njenałp/354
njenjeroź/352
njenow/354
njenunw/354
njeparow/354
njepintś/352
njepišć/352
njepjerjow/354
njepjerkow/354
njepjerow/354
njepjerź/352
njeplamp/354
njeplišć/352
njepuchoŕkow/354
njepódejm/349
njepódnajm/349
njepódob/354
njepódpśim/349
njepódružb/354
njepójaw/354
njepójm/349
njepław/354
njepśedwiź/352
njepśejm/349
njepśenajm/349
njepśepśim/349
njepśeśiw/354
njepśim/349
njepśinajm/349
njepśipśim/349
njepśizajm/349
njerob/354
njerop/354
njerownosć/334
njerozdym/354
njerozgriw/354
njeroź/334
njerožow/354
njesejź/352
njeslěp/354
njesněgow/354
njesurow/354
njeswjerb/354
njeswójźb/354
njesłab/354
njesław/354
njetešnj/1,335
njetob/354
njetop/354
njetryšć/352
njetucnj/1,335
njetup/354
njeturkow/354
njetwardnj/1,335
njetšub/354
njewab/354
njewiź/352
njewjerś/352
njewobejm/349
njewobpśim/349
njewobsejź/352
njewoklep/354
njewopśim/349
njewrjašć/352
njewujm/349
njewupśim/349
njewuzejm/349
njewónoź/352
njewóseb/354
njewótejm/349
njewótnajm/349
njewótpójm/349
njewótwiź/352
njewěsć/334
njewšow/354
njezagadow/354
njezapśim/349
njezasromoś/352
njezawiź/352
njezejm/349
njezub/354
njezłob/354
njełakom/354
njełom/354
njełup/354
njeśamnj/1,335
njeśerp/354
njeśišć/352
nješkóź/352
nješlamow/354
nješlarp/354
nješlimow/354
nješum/354
nješylaw/354
nješylep/354
nješćerb/354
nježadław/354
nježałob/354
nježenj/1,335
nježrěb/354
nježydnj/1,335
nježłob/354
nož/356
pakosć/334
panjewóz/356
pintś/352
pišć/352
pjakajaŕsk/1,341
pjenjez/356
pjerjow/354
pjerź/352
plamp/354
pomsć/334
pódejm/349
pódnajm/349
pódpśim/349
pójaw/354
pójm/349
pójěz/362
pólen/332
pěsć/334
pěź/334
płaś/334
pśedwiź/352
pśenajm/349
pśepśim/349
pśim/350
pśinajm/349
pśipśim/349
pśizajm/349
rbb-j/1,348
ros/362
rownosć/334
rozgriw/354
smjerś/334
sobuluź/346
sol/331
starosć/334
stwjerś/334
supermusk/1,341
swěźenj/1,344
tešnj/1,335
tryšć/352
tucnj/1,335
turkow/354
twardnj/1,335
tšoj/351
v-muž/356
wezymsk/1,341
wiź/352
wjerś/352
wobejm/349
wobpśim/349
wobsejź/352
wobwóc/1,360
wobwócyj/1,347
wopśim/349
woł/358
wrjašć/352
wujm/349
wuměr/361
wupśim/349
wusn/1,333
wuzejm/349
wónoź/352
wóseb/354
wótejm/349
wótnajm/349
wótpójm/349
wótwiź/352
wěsć/334
zapśim/349
zasromoś/352
zawisć/334
zejm/349
Ü-wóz/356
Ćišinsk/1,341
Łužysk/1,341
łakosć/334
łoź/334
łup/354
Śańk/1,341
Śěžk/1,341
śamnj/1,335
śernj/1,344
šap/363
šerjenj/1,344
škrip/363
škóź/352
šlamow/354
šylep/354
źiśiźiś/1,342
Žemrjojsk/1,341
Žylojsk/1,341
žałosć/334
žołś/334
žydnj/1,335
žyź/1,347
